District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.19

Uniformity of application and construction. [Repealed]

Repealed.

History

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 119, 59 DCR 2542
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-273, § 4(g), 62 DCR 1938

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-273 repealed this section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 19 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-273: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-273 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined that the fiscal effect of D.C. Law 20-273 has been included in an approved budget and financial plan.